Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-6504
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Pet Insurance Act:

(1) Chronic condition means a condition that can be treated or managed, but not cured;

(2) Congenital anomaly or disorder means a condition that is present from birth, whether inherited or caused by the environment, which may cause or contribute to illness or disease;

(3) Hereditary disorder means an abnormality that is genetically transmitted from parent to offspring and may cause illness or disease;

(4) Orthopedic condition refers to a condition affecting the bones, skeletal muscle, cartilage, tendons, ligaments, and joints. Orthopedic condition includes, but is not limited to, elbow dysplasia, hip dysplasia, intervertebral disc degeneration, patellar luxation, and ruptured cranial cruciate ligaments. Orthopedic condition does not include cancer or metabolic, hemopoietic, or autoimmune disease;

(5) Pet insurance policy means a property insurance policy that provides coverage for accidents and illnesses of pets;

(6)(a) Preexisting condition means any condition for which any of the following are true prior to the effective date of a pet insurance policy or during any waiting period under such policy:

(i) A veterinarian provided medical advice;

(ii) The pet received previous treatment; or

(iii) Based on information from verifiable sources, the pet had signs or symptoms directly related to the condition for which a claim is being made.

(b) A condition for which coverage is afforded on a policy cannot be considered a preexisting condition on any renewal of the policy;

(7) Renewal means to issue and deliver at the end of an insurance policy period a policy which supersedes a policy previously issued and delivered by the same pet insurer or affiliated pet insurer and which provides types and limits of coverage substantially similar to those contained in the policy being superseded;

(8) Veterinarian means an individual who holds a valid license to practice veterinary medicine from the appropriate licensing entity in the jurisdiction in which such veterinarian practices;

(9) Veterinary expenses means the costs associated with medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment provided by a veterinarian, including, but not limited to, the cost of drugs prescribed by a veterinarian;

(10) Waiting period means the period of time specified in a pet insurance policy that is required to transpire before some or all of the coverage in the policy can begin. Waiting periods may not be applied to renewals of existing coverage; and

(11) Wellness program means a subscription or reimbursement-based program that is separate from an insurance policy that provides goods and services to promote the general health, safety, or well-being of the pet. If any wellness program undertakes to indemnify another, pays a specified amount upon determinable contingencies, or provides coverage for a fortuitous event, it is transacting the business of insurance and is subject to the insurance laws of this state. This definition is not intended to classify a contract directly between a service provider and a pet owner that only involves the two parties as being in the business of insurance unless other indications of insurance exist.

Laws 2023, LB296, § 4.